Utah statutes.
31A-22-511.   Dependents' coverage.

Any group life policy issued under Sections 31A-22-502 through 31A-22-505 or Section 31A-22-509 may insure the employees or members against loss due to the death of their spouses and dependent children, or any classes of the employees or members.  The premiums for the insurance shall be paid by the policyholder from funds contributed by the person to whom the policy has been issued, from funds contributed by the covered persons, or from both.  Except as provided under Section 31A-22-512, a policy on which no part of the premium for the dependent's coverage is contributed by the covered persons shall insure all insured persons, including their spouses and dependent or minor children.

